Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202666-1331
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that Nebraska should continue its existing programs to encourage processing, market development, promotion, distribution, and research on ethanol, ethanol coproducts, and products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts to provide for:

(1) Expanded use of Nebraska agricultural products;

(2) Efficient and less-polluting energy sources and reserves which will make Nebraska less energy dependent, improve air quality, and retain Nebraska dollars in the Nebraska economy to achieve a multiplier effect thereby generating additional jobs and tax income to the state rather than the export of Nebraska dollars;

(3) Development of protein products which will be efficiently stored and marketed domestically and internationally to encourage greater processing of Nebraska ethanol, ethanol coproducts, and products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts;

(4) New and enhanced outlets for Nebraska agricultural products which can be leveraged by Nebraska agricultural producers to facilitate strengthened demand and drive greater economic prosperity in rural communities. New and enhanced outlets may include ethanol plants, agricultural production facilities, or other facilities processing, marketing, or distributing ethanol, ethanol coproducts, or products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts;

(5) Collaboration with private industry to support existing ethanol production facilities in Nebraska and establish new facilities producing ethanol, ethanol coproducts, or products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts to strengthen and create demand for Nebraska agricultural products;

(6) Promotion and market development, in collaboration with private industry, of ethanol, ethanol coproducts, or products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts; and

(7) Sponsorship of research and development of industrial and commercial uses for ethanol, ethanol coproducts, and products derived from ethanol or ethanol coproducts in order to enhance economic feasibility and marketing potential of such products and processes.

Laws 1993, LB 364, § 2;

Laws 2026, LB815, § 4.
July 18, 2026